District of Columbia statutes.
2-1515.54

Notice requirements.

The Administrator shall provide notice of the requirements of this part to:

(1)

The relevant staff at the place of confinement, including:

(A)

All medical staff;

(B)

Staff and contractors who are involved in the transport of confined youth of child-bearing age; and

(C)

Other staff as the Administrator deems appropriate; and

(2)

All youth who are in their third trimester of pregnancy at the time the place of confinement takes custody of the person.

Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-335, § 154
as added July 25, 2015, D.C. Law 20-280, § 101(b), 62 DCR 1495

History